Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-804. Cessation of participation — Definition.

The member's participation in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall cease at the time the member separates from service.

When the member's participation in the plan ceases, the member shall elect to receive the balance in the deferred option account as either a lump sum or as a monthly benefit paid in the form elected by the member for payment of the deferred retirement benefit.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall determine factors to be used for the conversion of deferred option account balances to monthly amounts.

Furthermore, when the member's participation in the plan ceases, the board shall cause the member's annuity benefit to be paid directly to the member in the form of regular monthly amounts in the same amount and manner as would have been the case if the member had retired on the deferred retirement option date and had made the same election pursuant to § 24-4-606 that was made on or before the deferred retirement option date.

When a member's participation in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan ceases, the member shall separate from service as provided in § 24-4-520 unless the separation period would prevent a popularly elected official from taking or holding office.

This section does not apply to a member who was an employee of the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, or the State Plant Board, and who is a participant in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan who may be eligible for reemployment after satisfying the separation requirements of § 24-4-520(b) as an essential seasonal staff member with the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, or the State Plant Board.

This section does not apply to a member who was an employee of the Department of Agriculture on or after July 1, 2019, and who is a participant in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan who may be eligible for reemployment after satisfying the separation requirements of § 24-4-520(b) as an essential seasonal staff member with the department.

As used in subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section, “essential seasonal staff member” means an employee of the department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, or the State Plant Board who:

Has specialized knowledge, skill, or training pertaining to necessary duties or tasks to be completed by the department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, or the State Plant Board in times of emergency, disaster cleanup, extreme weather, or other circumstances deemed pressing by the department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, or the State Plant Board; and

Is employed by the department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, or the State Plant Board on a part-time basis:

During times of emergency, disaster cleanup, extreme weather, or other circumstances deemed pressing by the department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, or the State Plant Board; or

As an instructor to train other staff for times of emergency, disaster cleanup, extreme weather, or other circumstances deemed pressing by the department, the Arkansas Forestry Commission, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, or the State Plant Board.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1052, § 4; 2001, No. 151, § 51; 2011, No. 38, § 9; 2017, No. 245, § 1; 2017, No. 552, § 1; 2019, No. 448, § 12; 2019, No. 624, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 121.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 624, § 1 specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2019, No. 448, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (c).

The 2017 amendment by No. 245 redesignated former (c) as (c)(1); and added (c)(2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 552 substituted “the member shall separate from service as provided in” for “that member is not eligible for employment in any position covered by the plans identified in § 24-2-401(3), except as provided for in” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 448 added “unless the separation period would prevent a popularly elected official from taking or holding office” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 624 substituted “the member shall separate from service as provided in” for “that member is not eligible for employment in any position covered by the plans identified in § 24-2-401(3), except as provided for in” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 redesignated (c)(2)(A) as (c)(2)(A)(i) and added (c)(2)(A)(ii); and inserted “the Department of Agriculture” preceding “the Arkansas Forestry Commission” throughout (c)(2)(B).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2017, No. 552, § 2: Jan. 1, 2018.

24-4-805. Death or disability.

In the event that an Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan participant dies, the benefits payable from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be determined as though the participant had separated from service and been found eligible for monthly benefits by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on the day prior to the death, with death following immediately thereafter.

In the event that a plan participant applies for benefits from the system pursuant to § 24-4-511 related to disability retirement, the application shall be treated as an application for voluntary retirement pursuant to § 24-4-601 and no benefits other than those that would be payable without regard to the disability shall become payable.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1052, § 5; 2001, No. 151, § 52.

24-4-806. Limitation on benefit enhancement.

No benefit enhancement provided for by this subchapter shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization.

No benefit enhancement provided for by this subchapter shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liabilty is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1052, § 6.

Subchapter 9
— Arkansas Retirement Plan

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-4-901. Credited service — Reciprocity.

Upon the retirement of a member whose credited service results from employment covered by:

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

The State Police Retirement System;

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System;

An alternate retirement plan under § 24-8-101 et seq. or § 24-9-201 et seq.; or

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System,

Each retirement system shall be responsible financially for only that portion of the annuity based upon the credited service in the plan or system.

The final average compensation on which benefits shall be determined shall be based on the period of total credited service for:

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

The State Police Retirement System;

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System; and

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System,

Compensation for credited service in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System or an alternate retirement plan under § 24-8-101 et seq. or § 24-9-201 et seq. shall not be used to determine final average compensation.

The final average compensation for persons receiving benefits from the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall be based on the final average compensation at the date of termination of employment covered by that system.

The benefit program to be applied to each portion of credited service shall be the benefit program in effect in each plan or system at the time of retirement.

Upon the retirement on disability or death in service of a member of either:

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System;

The State Police Retirement System;

An alternate retirement plan under § 24-8-101 et seq. or § 24-9-201 et seq.; or

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System,

If the greatest benefit payable to a survivor is a minimum percentage of the deceased member's final pay or a minimum dollar amount, then each reciprocal system that has a minimum benefit provision in its plan shall only pay a proportionate share of the minimum amount based on the ratio of service in the system to the total service in all reciprocal systems.

A member who dies in service while a member of one (1) reciprocal system shall be considered as currently employed by all systems in which the member has credited service at the time of death.

If a member has service credit in an alternate retirement plan under § 24-8-101 et seq. or § 24-9-201 et seq., disability and death-in-service benefits shall be contingent on provision of those benefits having been provided by the alternate retirement plan and having been selected by the member as a benefit.

Any person retiring on or after July 1, 1982, with credited service in more than one (1) reciprocal system shall have his or her benefits recomputed based on the provisions of this section.

It is the intent of this section to provide reciprocal service credits, as provided by §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405, between contributory and noncontributory members of:

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System;

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

The State Police Retirement System;

An alternate retirement plan for a college, university, or the Division of Higher Education provided for under § 24-8-101 et seq. or for a vocational-technical school or the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development, provided for under § 24-9-201 et seq.; and

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

A member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who is receiving a retirement annuity from another reciprocal system as defined in subsection (d) of this section shall not be eligible to use the reciprocal provisions of this section or the reciprocal provisions of §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405 to determine the benefit payable by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

the amount of the member's annuity shall be based upon his or her total credited service in force at the time of the member's retirement, exclusive of any minimums.

with each plan or system computing the final average compensation by the method as determined by its laws.

who has credited service in more than one (1) of the plans, an annuity shall be payable based upon the member's total credited service with all systems in force at the time of retirement, with each system being responsible for the payment of such disability or death-in-service benefits as are provided by the applicable provisions of each system's laws or plan's provisions.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 53; 2019, No. 910, § 2368.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (d)(6), substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” and “Division of Career and Technical Education, Adult Education Section of the Division of Workforce Services, and the Office of Skills Development” for “Department of Career Education”.

Subchapter 10
— Retirement Benefits

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-4-1001. Determination of benefits for wildlife officers — Responsibility for additional costs.

For purposes of determining benefits under this chapter, all credited service, whenever earned, of persons employed as wildlife officers of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission on July 4, 1983, and of persons thereafter employed in such positions prior to July 1, 1997, shall be treated as public safety member service.

The additional cost to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System of this section shall be the responsibility of the commission, and the commission shall pay to the system an additional twelve percent (12%) of covered payroll at the same time as employer contributions are paid by law for other commission employees.

It is the specific intent of this section to provide that the twelve percent (12%) contribution referenced in subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to those required by § 24-2-701(c).

Any person who is covered on July 3, 1989, by a state-supported retirement system and who was a member of the system on July 4, 1983, in a position defined by the system as “public safety member” shall receive credit for public safety member service for any service as a wildlife officer with the commission, which service was rendered before July 4, 1983.

Provided, the additional cost to the system shall be the responsibility of the member, and the member shall pay to the system any additional cost, as computed by actuarial determination.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 53.

24-4-1002. Benefit provisions — Subjection of annuity rights to process of law.

The right of a person to an annuity, to the return of accumulated contributions, the annuity itself, any annuity option, any other right accrued or accruing under the provisions of § 24-4-101 et seq., and all moneys belonging to a plan shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or any other process of law whatsoever and shall be unassignable, except as is specifically provided in this chapter.

An employer shall have the right of setoff for any claim arising from embezzlement by or fraud of a member, retirant, or beneficiary.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 53.

24-4-1003. Benefit provisions — Inspection of records.

All records kept by an Arkansas public retirement system, whether required to be kept by law or board policy, shall be open to public inspection as provided in § 25-19-105, except that individual member's records which are kept for the purpose of compiling information for the member's retirement or Social Security records shall not be open to the public.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 53.

24-4-1004. Determination of benefits for civilian firefighters of State Military Department or Department of the Military — Responsibility for additional costs.

For purposes of determining benefits under this chapter, all credited service, whenever earned, of persons employed as civilian firefighters of the State Military Department or Department of the Military as of July 1, 1997, and of persons thereafter employed in those positions shall be treated as public safety member service if the position is one hundred percent (100%) federally funded.

The additional cost to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as computed by actuarial determination is the responsibility of the employer and is in addition to those costs required by § 24-2-701(c).

Employment as a public safety member shall be credited at one and one-half (1½) times the regular rate for crediting service.

A public safety member who purchases military service credit under § 24-2-502 shall be credited at the regular rate for credited service and not an enhanced rate.

A public safety member shall pay the same rate for the purchase of service credit from the system as a member of the system who is not a public safety member.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 978, § 4; 2017, No. 437, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5548.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (d).

The 2019 amendment inserted “or Department of the Military” in (a).

Subchapter 11
— Contributions of Members to their Deposit Accounts

Effective Dates.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 5: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2009, No. 1200, § 3: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this country is in a recession, that Arkansas retirants have been hurt economically by the recession, that this act will increase benefits for those retirants that served the state the longest period of time, that the fiscal year of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System begins on July 1 of each year, and that these changes are needed by July 1, 2009, in order to have a smooth transition between fiscal years. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 20, § 5: Feb. 9, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System currently requires that retirement contributions be based on a member's base salary plus any multipliers; that retirement contributions and benefits should be determined based on a member's base salary and not any multipliers or special salary allowances; and that this act is immediately necessary to clarify the meaning of the term ‘compensation’ for purposes of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 332, § 13: Mar. 14, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is vital that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System be permitted to immediately implement policies regarding the termination of employment, eligibility of employees to receive benefits, availability of information, and when to pay interest on employee contributions; and to clarify the meaning of terms in the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated to avoid the undue consumption of the system's resources. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-4-1101. Membership.

A public employee, as defined in § 24-4-101(17), first hired on or after July 1, 2005, is subject to the benefit provisions of this subchapter.

A public employee who remains an active member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System may elect coverage under the benefit provisions of this subchapter.

If the member elects contributory coverage, the effective date of the member's contributory coverage shall be:

The first payroll period that is paid and reported in the next month after the contributory election; and

Prospective only.

A conversion or purchase of noncontributory service into contributory service under this subchapter is not allowed.

The election shall be made as directed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and is irrevocable.

Noncontributory members who terminate covered service for a period of more than six (6) months and subsequently return to covered service will be subject to the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4; 2009, No. 742, § 2; 2011, No. 140, § 2; 2013, No. 332, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b)(1)(B), redesignated the remainder of (b)(1) accordingly, and substituted “July 1, 2009” for “July 1, 2005” twice in (b)(1)(A).

The 2011 amendment inserted present (c) and redesignated former (c) as (d).

The 2013 amendment substituted “A public employee” for “All public employees” in (a); in (b)(1)(A), substituted “A public employee who remains an active member” for “All public employees hired prior to July 1, 2005, and who are active members”; and “may” for “on July 1, 2009, shall have six (6) months from July 1, 2009, to”; substituted “in the next month after the contributory election” for “in January 2010” in (b)(1)(B)(i); in (b)(2), substituted “A” for “No” and inserted “not”; deleted former (c); and redesignated former (d) as present (c), and made stylistic changes.

24-4-1102. Member contributions.

The contributions of a member shall be five percent (5%) of the member's annual compensation and shall be placed in the member's deposit account as provided in § 24-4-401.

Interest shall be paid on accumulated member contributions at the rate of two percent (2%) per annum.

As used in this subsection, “compensation” has the same meaning as in § 24-4-101.

For purposes of deferring federal and state income tax under 26 U.S.C. § 414(h)(2), as adopted by § 26-51-414, the employer shall pick up the member's contributions to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System required by this section payable on or after July 1, 2005.

Member contributions picked up by the employer shall be paid from the same source of funds used for the payment of salary to a member.

The employer shall be solely responsible for remitting member contributions to the system in a manner consistent with § 24-4-202, including without limitation compliance with deadlines and penalties.

A deduction shall be made from each member's salary equal to the amount of the member's contribution picked up by the employer.

For all other purposes, member contributions picked up by the employer shall be considered member contributions.

Upon termination of covered service, a former member may request a refund of the former member's accumulated contributions under § 24-4-603, except that interest will be credited on all balances for service through the last completed fiscal year as provided in § 24-4-209(a).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4; 2007, No. 176, § 7; 2011, No. 20, § 4; 2019, No. 526, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “two percent (2%)” for “four percent (4%)” in (a)(2).

24-4-1103. Benefits generally.

Upon retirement under this subchapter, a member shall receive a straight life pension equal to two and three-hundredths percent (2.03%) of the member's final average compensation multiplied by the number of years and any fraction of a year of the member's service for each year of contributory service rendered prior to July 1, 2007.

For each year of contributory service in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System rendered after June 30, 2007, the member shall receive two percent (2%) of the member's final average compensation multiplied by the number of years and any fraction of a year of the member's service.

For each year of actual service in the system in excess of twenty-eight (28) years that is rendered on or after July 1, 2009, a member shall receive a straight life annuity equal to an additional five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) of the member's final average compensation.

Any member may voluntarily retire upon filing a written application with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days before the date the member desires to be retired if that member has:

Twenty-eight (28) or more years of credited service regardless of age; or

Attained or attains sixty-five (65) years of age and has five (5) or more years of actual service.

However, a member of the General Assembly must have ten (10) or more years of actual service if the member only has service as a member of the General Assembly.

No temporary annuity will be provided to members covered by this subchapter.

The maximum benefit payable upon retirement shall be one hundred percent (100%) of the member's final average compensation without regard to any postretirement increases enacted by the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4; Acts 2007, No. 220, § 2; 2009, No. 1200, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (a)(3).

24-4-1104. Annuity options.

Before the date the first payment of a member's annuity is due, a member may elect to receive the annuity as a straight life annuity or as one (1) of the reduced annuity options provided in § 24-4-606.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4.

24-4-1105. Deferred and early annuities.

Any member or former member with sufficient years of actual service to qualify for a vested termination annuity who has not attained normal retirement age may retire with an early annuity provided in § 24-4-510(a).

In the event a member with five (5) or more years of actual service in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System ceases employment as a covered member before reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or attaining twenty-eight (28) years of service and does not withdraw his or her accumulated employee contributions to the system, the member is entitled to receive an annuity upon attainment of sixty-five (65) years of age and submission of a retirement application to the system.

If a former member has applied for a refund of contributions but returns to employment with a participating public employer prior to the date the refunded contributions are received, the request is void and employment must be terminated again to request a refund of contributions.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4.

24-4-1106. Benefits — Death of retirant.

In the event a retirant receiving a straight life pension dies before the retirant has received an aggregate amount of straight life pension payments equal to the accumulated contributions credited in the retirant's deposit account at the time of retirement, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of straight life pension payments received by the retirant shall be paid to the named beneficiary.

If no designated person survives the retirant, the difference, if any, shall be paid in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the State of Arkansas.

The payments may be made directly to a curator, guardian, administrator, or executor authorized to receive the payments with or without the appointment of a representative in this state.

No benefits will be paid under this section if survivor benefits are otherwise payable to a named beneficiary.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4.

24-4-1107. Redetermination of benefits.

Each July 1 the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall redetermine the amount of each monthly benefit that has been payable by the system for at least twelve (12) calendar months. The redetermined amount is payable for the following twelve (12) calendar months.

The redetermined amount is the amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by three percent (3%).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4.

24-4-1108. Benefit provisions — Death in service.

If an active member or former member with less than five (5) years of actual service dies while employed by a covered employer, the member's accumulated contributions and interest are refundable to the named beneficiary.

If no designated person survives the member, the accumulated contributions will be paid in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the State of Arkansas.

The payments may be made directly to a curator, guardian, administrator, or executor authorized to receive the payments with or without the appointment of a representative in this state.

If an active member or former member with five (5) or more years of actual service dies before retirement, the benefits under this section will be paid upon written application to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as provided in § 24-4-608.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4.

24-4-1109. Maximum benefit limitation.

Benefits paid under this chapter shall not exceed the limitations of section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code that are applicable to governmental retirement plans.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System is authorized to promulgate all rules necessary to implement the limitations of section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code.

The rules adopted by the board under this section shall be amended to reflect any changes in the content or application of section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code enacted by Congress or promulgated by the Internal Revenue Service.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2084, § 4.

U.S. Code.

Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code referred to in (b)(2) is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 415.